North Dakota, session 69, HB1625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15-10-64 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15-10-64. University of North Dakota men's varsity golf program.
If certain real property known as the Ray Richards golf course or Ray Richards golf course addition,
3801 demers avenue, lot 1, block 1, and Ray Richards golf course addition, 3501 demers avenue, lot 2,
block 1, in the records of the city of Grand Forks, or any portion of the property, is conveyed, fifty-three
and fifty-seven one hundredths percent of the sale price must be transferred to a permanent
endowment fund named the Ray Richards golf endowment fund, which must be controlled and
administered by the university of North Dakota alumni foundation for the sole benefit of the university of
North Dakota men's varsity golf program in honor of the Ray Richards family. If the university of North
Dakota men's varsity golf program has been terminated prior to the conveyance, so much of the funds
in the Ray Richards golf endowment fund as necessary must be used to reinstate the program, and the
remainder must be used for the sole benefit of the programdocumented and used for improvements to
the Ray Richards golf course or for the direct benefit of the university of North Dakota men's and
women's varsity golf programs.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA - RAY RICHARDS GOLF
COURSE CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS. There is appropriated from other funds derived from the sale of
real property known as the Ray Richards golf course, and from donations and other local funds, the
sum of $4,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the university of North Dakota for
the purpose of making capital improvements to the Ray Richards golf course, for the period beginning
with the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective immediately upon its filing with the
secretary of state.

H. B. NO. 1625 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1625.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2026.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2026.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2026,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State